District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-413

Liability — Partner’s breach of trust.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 639, Pub. L. 87-709, § 14
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 41-113.
1973 Ed., § 41-313.